Washington statutes.
RCW 35.62.021

Election—Petition or resolution.

The question of whether the name of a city or town shall be changed shall be presented to the voters of the city or town upon either: (1) The adoption of a resolution by the city or town council proposing a specific name change; or (2) the submission of a petition proposing a specific name change that has been signed by voters of the city or town equal in number to at least ten percent of the total number of voters of the city or town who voted at the last municipal general election. However, for any newly incorporated city or town that has not had city officials elected at a normal general municipal election, the election that is used as the base for determining the number of required signatures shall be the election at which the initial elected officials were elected.

The election on changing the name of the city or town shall be held at the next general election occurring sixty or more days after the resolution was adopted, or the resolution [petition] was submitted that has been certified by the county auditor as having sufficient valid signatures.

[ 1990 c 193 s 1.]